Maryland, session 2026, SB0962.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
10–1701.
(d) (1) Except as provided in [paragraph] PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) of this
subsection, an individual or entity that appointed a member may remove or suspend the
member in accordance with subsection (c) of this section only after:
(i) consultation with the chair of the board, committee, commission,
task force, or workgroup; and
(ii) the member has been given notice and an opportunity to be heard
regarding the reason for removal or suspension.
(2) The requirements of paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection do not apply if
the member being removed or suspended is the chair of the board, committee, commission,
task force, or workgroup.
(3) THE REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION DO
NOT APPLY IF THE MEMBER IS SUBJECT TO REMOVAL UNDER § 10–1703 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
10–1703.

SENATE BILL 962 3
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO AN INDIVIDUAL CONVICTED OF A CRIME IN
RELATION TO THE ATTACK ON THE UNITED STATES CAPITOL ON JANUARY 6, 2021,
REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE INDIVIDUAL WAS SUBSEQUENTLY PARDONED.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN INDIVIDUAL SERVING ON:
(1) A STANDING COMMITTEE, AS DEFINED IN § 2–101 OF THIS
ARTICLE; OR
(2) A COMMITTEE ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 2 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(C) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, AN INDIVIDUAL
CONVICTED OF A CRIME IN RELATION TO THE ATTACK ON THE UNITED STATES
CAPITOL ON JANUARY 6, 2021, MAY NOT SERVE:
(1) ON A BOARD, COMMITTEE, COMMISSION, TASK FORCE, OR
WORKGROUP CREATED BY STATE LAW;
(2) IN THE EXECUTIVE SERVICE OF STATE GOVERNMENT, AS DEFINED
IN § 6–404 OF THE STATE PERSONNEL AND PENSIONS ARTICLE; OR
(3) IN A POSITION CATEGORIZED AS A SPECIAL APPOINTMENT UNDER
§ 6–405 OF THE STATE PERSONNEL AND PENSIONS ARTICLE.
(D) IF AN APPOINTING AUTHORITY DETERMINES THAT AN INDIVIDUAL IS
SERVING IN A ROLE IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION, THE APPOINTING AUTHORITY
SHALL TAKE IMMEDIATE ACTION TO REMOVE OR TERMINATE THE EMPLOYMENT OF
THE INDIVIDUAL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.